test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-atya.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - ӓтя: # Noun 'a father'
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom: ӓтя
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Gen: ӓтян
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Acc: ӓтям
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Com: ӓтяге
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Dat: ӓтялӓн
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Ine: ӓтяштӹ
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Ill: [ӓтяш, ӓтяшкӹ]
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Lat: ӓтяэш
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Cmpr: ӓтялӓ
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Abe: ӓтяде

     ӓтя+N+Pl+Nom: ӓтявлӓ

     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: [ӓтям, ӓтяэм]
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: [ӓтят, ӓтяэт]
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓтяжӹ
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/PC: ӓтянӓ
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/PC: ӓтядӓ
     ӓтя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC: ӓтяштӹ
